Hawaii statutes.
§431:30-112 Rules and operating procedures;
rulemaking functions of the commission and rejection of uniform standards. (a)
The commission shall adopt reasonable rules, including uniform standards, and
operating procedures to effectively and efficiently achieve the purposes of
this compact. Notwithstanding the foregoing, in the event the commission
exercises its rulemaking authority in a manner that is beyond the scope of the
purposes of this article or the powers granted hereunder, such action by the commission
shall be invalid and have no force and effect.

(b) Rules and operating procedures shall be
made pursuant to a rulemaking process that conforms to the Model State
Administrative Procedure Act of 1981, as amended,
as may be appropriate to the operations of the commission. Before the
commission adopts a uniform standard, the commission shall give written notice
to the relevant state legislative committees in each compacting state
responsible for insurance issues of its intention to adopt the uniform
standard. In adopting a uniform standard, the commission shall consider fully
all submitted materials and issue a concise explanation of its decision.

(c) A uniform standard shall become effective
ninety days after its adoption by the commission or such later date as the
commission may determine; provided that a compacting state may "opt
out" of a uniform standard as provided in this article. "Opt
out" shall be defined as any action by a compacting state to decline to
adopt or participate in an adopted uniform standard. All other rules and
operating procedures, and amendments thereto, shall become effective as of the
date specified in each rule, operating procedure, or amendment.

(d) A compacting state may opt out of a
uniform standard, either by legislation or by rule adopted by the insurance
commissioner. If a compacting state elects to opt out of a uniform standard by
rule, it shall:

(1) Give written notice to the commission no later
than ten business days after the later of the adoption of the uniform standard
or the state becoming a compacting state;

(2) Find that the uniform standard does not provide
reasonable protections to the citizens of the state, given the conditions in
the state. The commissioner shall make specific findings of fact and
conclusions of law, based on a preponderance of the evidence, detailing the
conditions in the state that warrant a departure from the uniform standard and
determining that the uniform standard would not reasonably protect the citizens
of the state. The commissioner shall consider and balance the following
factors and find that the conditions in the state and needs of the citizens of
the state outweigh:

(A) The intent of the legislature to
participate in, and reap the benefits of, an interstate agreement to establish
national uniform consumer protections for the products subject to this article;
and

(B) The presumption that a uniform standard
adopted by the commission provides reasonable protections to consumers of the
relevant product.

Notwithstanding the foregoing, a compacting
state may, at the time of its enactment of this compact, prospectively opt out
of all uniform standards involving long-term care insurance products by
expressly providing for such opt out in the enacted compact, and such an opt
out shall not be treated as a material variance in the offer or acceptance of
any state to participate in this compact. An opt out pursuant to this section
shall be effective at the time of enactment of this compact by the compacting
state and shall apply to all existing uniform standards involving long-term
care insurance products and those subsequently adopted; and

(3) In accordance with the provisions of paragraph
(2), this State does prospectively opt out of all uniform standards involving
long-term care insurance products promulgated by the commission, as this State
has previously enacted article 10H providing additional standards for federal
conformity and universal availability for reciprocal beneficiary and
multi-generation populace which facilitates flexibility and innovation in the
development of long-term care insurance coverage.

(e) If a compacting state elects to opt out of
a uniform standard, the uniform standard shall remain applicable in the
compacting state electing to opt out until such time the opt out legislation is
enacted into law or the opt out regulation becomes effective.

Once the opt out of a uniform standard by a
compacting state becomes effective as provided under the laws of that state,
the uniform standard shall have no further force and effect in that state
unless and until the legislation or regulation implementing the opt out is
repealed or otherwise becomes ineffective under the laws of the state. If a
compacting state opts out of a uniform standard after the uniform standard has
been made effective in that state, the opt out shall have the same prospective
effect as provided under section 431:30-119 for withdrawals.

(f) If a compacting state has formally
initiated the process of opting out of a uniform standard by regulation, and
while the regulatory opt out is pending, the compacting state may petition the
commission, at least fifteen days before the effective date of the uniform
standard, to stay the effectiveness of the uniform standard in that state. The
commission may grant a stay if it determines the regulatory opt out is being
pursued in a reasonable manner and there is a likelihood of success. If a stay
is granted or extended by the commission, the stay or extension thereof may
postpone the effective date by up to ninety days, unless affirmatively extended
by the commission; provided that a stay may not be permitted to remain in
effect for more than one year unless the compacting state can show
extraordinary circumstances that warrant a continuance of the stay, including
but not limited to the existence of a legal challenge that prevents the
compacting state from opting out. A stay may be terminated by the commission
upon notice that the rulemaking process has been terminated.

(g) Not later than thirty days after a rule or
operating procedure is adopted, any person may file a petition for judicial
review of the rule or operating procedure; provided that the filing of such
petition shall not stay or otherwise prevent such rule or operating procedure
from becoming effective unless there is a finding that there is a substantial likelihood of success on behalf of the
party filing such petition. The court shall give deference to the actions of
the commission consistent with applicable law and shall not find the rule or
operating procedure to be unlawful if such rule or operating procedure
represents a reasonable exercise of the commission's authority. [L 2004, c 104,
pt of §2; am L 2010, c 116, §1(27)]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next